v1.1/old/guesser.foma
define MultipleForms GKa ∘
                     GKe ∘
                     "[Opt_PRS_2Sg]" -> g i     || V V  _                 ∘
                     "[Opt_PRS_2Sg]" -> "~sf" i || [C - gh] _             ∘
                     "[Opt_PRS_2Sg]" -> "~sf" i || [e | DoubleVowel] gh _ ∘
                     "[Opt_PRS_2Sg]" -> n       || t e _                  ∘
                     "[Opt_PRS_2Sg]" -> "~f" i  || [C - t] e _            ∘
                     "[Opt_PRS_2Sg]" -> ":" a   || FullVowel gh _         ∘
                     "[Opt_PRS_2Sg]" -> 0                                 ∘
                     "[Opt_FUT_Intr]" -> "@₁" "–" l gh a a || [ V ("*") ("*") | "(pete)fte" ] _ ∘
                     "[Opt_FUT_Intr]" -> "~sf" "–" ghh a a || gh _        ∘
                     "[Opt_FUT_Intr]" -> "~sf" "–" gg a a  || g  _        ∘
                     "[Opt_FUT_Intr]" -> n a k e n                        ∘
                     "[To_Feel_R_Toward]" ->       "~" "–" k e || V _     ∘
                     "[To_Feel_R_Toward]" -> "@₁" "~f" y u k e || C _     ∘
                     "[Opt_PRS_2Sg_3Sg]" -> "~f" "(i₁)" g u || [ V ("*") ("*") | "(pete)fte" ] _    ∘
                     "[Opt_PRS_2Sg_3Sg]" -> "~sf" "–" ghh u || [ q | gh | ghh | qw | ghw | ghhw ] _ ∘
                     "[Opt_PRS_2Sg_3Sg]" -> "~sf" "–" gg u  || C _                                  ∘
	                 "~f-w/-w" ->      "-w" || WordBoundary (C) V C (C) V (C) _                     ∘
                     "~f-w/-w" -> "~f" "-w"                                                         ∘
                     "~sf-w:(e)tgun/teggun" -> t e gg u n || [ gh "*" | g ] _                       ,, 
                     "~sf-w:(e)tgun/teggun" -> "~sf" "-w" ":" "(e)" t g u n                         ∘
                     "@₁–lghii/@*ngugh*" -> "@₁" "–" l gh i i || [ [Alphabet - "*"] | "(pete)fte" ] _ ,,
                     "@₁–lghii/@*ngugh*" -> "@*" ng u gh "*" || "*" _                                 ∘             
                     "@₁~fy/~f(ng₁)" -> "~f" "(ng₁)" || [ V ("*") ("*") | "(pete)fte" ] _             ,,  
                     "@₁~fy/~f(ng₁)" -> "@₁" "~f" y  || [ [ C | V ] ("*") ("*") | "(pete)fte" ] _     ∘
                     "@₁" "–" ng h i t e "*" "*" "@₁~flu/na" k u    -> "–" g p e n a a n        ∘
                     "@₁" "–" ng h i t e "*" "*" "@₁~flu/na" t e n  -> "–" g p e n a ng         ∘
                     "@₁" "–" ng h i t e "*" "*" "@₁~flu/na" t a    -> "–" g p e n a a m t a    ∘
                     "@₁" "–" ng h i t e "*" "*" "@₁~flu/na" t u ng -> "–" g p e n a a m t u ng ∘
                     "@₁" "–" ng h i t e "*" "*" "@₁~flu/na"        -> "–" g p e n a            ∘
                     "~" ":" "(ng₁)" i t e "*" "*" "@₁~flu/na" k u    -> "~f" "–" ng u n a a n        ∘
                     "~" ":" "(ng₁)" i t e "*" "*" "@₁~flu/na" t e n  -> "~f" "–" ng u n a ng         ∘
                     "~" ":" "(ng₁)" i t e "*" "*" "@₁~flu/na" t a    -> "~f" "–" ng u n a a m t a    ∘
                     "~" ":" "(ng₁)" i t e "*" "*" "@₁~flu/na" t u ng -> "~f" "–" ng u n a a m t u ng ∘
                     "~" ":" "(ng₁)" i t e "*" "*" "@₁~flu/na"        -> "~f" "–" ng u n a            ∘
                     "@₁~flu/na" k u -> n a a n            || t e "*" _ ∘
                     "@₁~flu/na" t e n -> n a ng           || t e "*" _ ∘
                     "@₁~flu/na" t a -> n a a m t a        || t e "*" _ ∘
                     "@₁~flu/na" t u ng  -> n a a m t u ng || t e "*" _ ∘
                     "@₁~flu/na" -> "@₁" "~f" l u                       ∘
					 [ a | u ] -> i || _ gh "~sf" ":" "(e)" s q e       ;

define EncliticAttachment "[Encl]" m i -> 0  || m i _              ∘
                                     q -> gh || _ "[Encl]" Nasal   ∘
									 k -> g  || _ "[Encl]" Nasal   ∘
                                     t -> 0  || _ "[Encl]" ng      ∘
                                     q -> gh || _ "[Encl]" q u n   ,,
                                     q -> 0  || _ "[Encl]" q u n   ∘
                                     t -> s  || _ "[Encl]" t a     ∘
                                  [..] -> n  || V _ "[Encl]" t u q ∘
                              "[Encl]" -> 0                        ;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          !!!
!!!      Clean-Up Rules      !!!
!!!                          !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

define ClusterDevoicing k  -> q  || gh _ ∘
                        kw -> qw || gh _ ∘
                        y -> s || _ [Stop | VoicelessFricative | VoicelessNasal] ∘
                        y -> s || [Stop | VoicelessFricative | VoicelessNasal] _ ∘
                        t [z | y] -> s                                           ∘ ! tz/ty cluster becomes s
                        v -> f || Stop _                                         ∘
                        v -> f || _ Stop                                         ∘
                        t v -> f || C _                                          ∘
                        v -> f || k _                                            ∘
                        z -> s || Stop _                                         ;

define Undoubling ll -> l, rr -> r, gg -> g, ghh -> gh, ghhw -> ghw || _ [Stop | f | s]     ∘   
                  ll -> l, rr -> r, gg -> g, ghh -> gh, ghhw -> ghw || [Stop | f | s | h] _ ∘   
                  mm -> m, nn -> n, ngng -> ng, ngngw -> ngw        || [Stop | f | s | h] _ ∘
                  ll -> l, rr -> r, gg -> g, ghh -> gh, ghhw -> ghw || _ ll ∘ 
                  ll -> l, rr -> r, gg -> g, ghh -> gh, ghhw -> ghw || [ll| rr | gg | ghh |ghhw] _ ∘ 
                  mm -> m, nn -> n, ngng -> ng, ngngw -> ngw        || [ll| rr | gg | ghh |ghhw] _ ;

def BaseFinalEndings ghw      -> qw , 
                     gh ("*") -> q  , 
                     g        -> k  ,
                     w        -> kw ,
                     t e      -> t a  ||   _ (Enclitic) WordBoundary , 
                     t e      -> n    || V _ (Enclitic) WordBoundary ∘
                     e        -> a    ||   _            WordBoundary ∘
                     gh q     -> q    ||   _ (Enclitic) WordBoundary ∘
                     t        -> n  ,
                     ll       -> l  ,
                     k        -> g    ||   WordBoundary Alphabet+ _ "ng" u q WordBoundary ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                        !!!
!!!      Rule Cascade      !!!
!!!                        !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

define Rules [
    Filters                        ∘
    Lexicon                        ∘
    Lowercase                      ∘
    MultipleForms                  ∘
    InsertMorphBoundary            ∘
    TripleCluster                  ∘
    !! ITERATION 1 !!
    ResolveAllomorphy              ∘
    ModifyTE                       ∘
    NoHopNoDropE                   ∘
    SemiAndFinalE                  ∘
    SemiFinalE                     ∘
    FinalVCDrop                    ∘
    FinalConsonantDropAssimilation ∘
    WeakFinalC                     ∘
    UnmarkStrongGh                 ∘
    InterConsonantalE              ∘
    UvularDropping                 ∘
    VelarUvularRounding            ∘
    FinalE                         ∘
    VowelDominance                 ∘
    CleanupMorphBoundary           ∘
    !! ITERATION 2 !!
    ResolveAllomorphy              ∘
    ModifyTE                       ∘
    NoHopNoDropE                   ∘
    SemiAndFinalE                  ∘
    SemiFinalE                     ∘
    FinalVCDrop                    ∘
    FinalConsonantDropAssimilation ∘
    WeakFinalC                     ∘
    UnmarkStrongGh                 ∘
    InterConsonantalE              ∘
    UvularDropping                 ∘
    VelarUvularRounding            ∘
    FinalE                         ∘
    VowelDominance                 ∘
    CleanupMorphBoundary           ∘
    !! ITERATION 3 !!
    ResolveAllomorphy              ∘
    ModifyTE                       ∘
    NoHopNoDropE                   ∘
    SemiAndFinalE                  ∘
    SemiFinalE                     ∘
    FinalVCDrop                    ∘
    FinalConsonantDropAssimilation ∘
    WeakFinalC                     ∘
    UnmarkStrongGh                 ∘
    InterConsonantalE              ∘
    UvularDropping                 ∘
    VelarUvularRounding            ∘
    FinalE                         ∘
    VowelDominance                 ∘
    CleanupMorphBoundary           ∘
    !! ITERATION 4 !!
    ResolveAllomorphy              ∘
    ModifyTE                       ∘
    NoHopNoDropE                   ∘
    SemiAndFinalE                  ∘
    SemiFinalE                     ∘
    FinalVCDrop                    ∘
    FinalConsonantDropAssimilation ∘
    WeakFinalC                     ∘
    UnmarkStrongGh                 ∘
    InterConsonantalE              ∘
    UvularDropping                 ∘
    VelarUvularRounding            ∘
    FinalE                         ∘
    VowelDominance                 ∘
    CleanupMorphBoundary           ∘
    !! ITERATION 5 !!
    ResolveAllomorphy              ∘
    ModifyTE                       ∘
    NoHopNoDropE                   ∘
    SemiAndFinalE                  ∘
    SemiFinalE                     ∘
    FinalVCDrop                    ∘
    FinalConsonantDropAssimilation ∘
    WeakFinalC                     ∘
    UnmarkStrongGh                 ∘
    InterConsonantalE              ∘
    UvularDropping                 ∘
    VelarUvularRounding            ∘
    FinalE                         ∘
    VowelDominance                 ∘
    CleanupMorphBoundary           ∘
    !! ITERATION 6 !!
    ResolveAllomorphy              ∘
    ModifyTE                       ∘
    NoHopNoDropE                   ∘
    SemiAndFinalE                  ∘
    SemiFinalE                     ∘
    FinalVCDrop                    ∘
    FinalConsonantDropAssimilation ∘
    WeakFinalC                     ∘
    UnmarkStrongGh                 ∘
    InterConsonantalE              ∘
    UvularDropping                 ∘
    VelarUvularRounding            ∘
    FinalE                         ∘
    VowelDominance                 ∘
    CleanupMorphBoundary           ∘
    !! ITERATION 7 !!
    ResolveAllomorphy              ∘
    ModifyTE                       ∘
    NoHopNoDropE                   ∘
    SemiAndFinalE                  ∘
    SemiFinalE                     ∘
    FinalVCDrop                    ∘
    FinalConsonantDropAssimilation ∘
    WeakFinalC                     ∘
    UnmarkStrongGh                 ∘
    InterConsonantalE              ∘
    UvularDropping                 ∘
    VelarUvularRounding            ∘
    FinalE                         ∘
    VowelDominance                 ∘
    CleanupMorphBoundary           ∘
    !! ITERATION 8 !!
    ResolveAllomorphy              ∘
    ModifyTE                       ∘
    NoHopNoDropE                   ∘
    SemiAndFinalE                  ∘
    SemiFinalE                     ∘
    FinalVCDrop                    ∘
    FinalConsonantDropAssimilation ∘
    WeakFinalC                     ∘
    UnmarkStrongGh                 ∘
    InterConsonantalE              ∘
    UvularDropping                 ∘
    VelarUvularRounding            ∘
    FinalE                         ∘
    VowelDominance                 ∘
    CleanupMorphBoundary           ∘
    TripleCluster                  ∘
	EncliticAttachment             ∘
    ClusterDevoicing               ∘
    BaseFinalEndings               ∘
    Undoubling
];


define Grammar [ Rules ] ;

push Grammar
